Idaho statutes. Title 15 UNIFORM PROBATE CODE
Part 1
Trust Registration

§ 15-7-101. Duty to register trusts.

The trustee of a trust having its principal place of administration in this state shall register the trust in the court of this state at the principal place of administration. Unless otherwise designated in the trust instrument, the principal place of administration of a trust is the trustee’s usual place of business where the records pertaining to the trust are kept, or at the trustee’s residence if he has no such place of business. In the case of co-trustees, the principal place of administration, if not otherwise designated in the trust instrument, is (1) the usual place of business of the corporate trustee if there is but one (1) corporate co-trustee, or (2) the usual place of business or residence of the individual trustee who is a professional fiduciary if there is but one (1) such person and no corporate co-trustee, and otherwise (3) the usual place of business or residence of any of the co-trustees as agreed upon by them. The duty to register under this Part does not apply to the trustee of a trust if registration would be inconsistent with the retained jurisdiction of a foreign court from which the trustee cannot obtain release.

§ 15-7-102. Registration procedures.

Registration shall be accomplished by filing a statement indicating the name and address of the trustee in which it acknowledges the trusteeship. The statement shall indicate whether the trust has been registered elsewhere. The statement shall identify the trust: (1) in the case of a testamentary trust, by the name of the testator and the date and place of domiciliary probate; (2) in the case of a written inter vivos trust, by the name of each settlor and the original trustee and the date of the trust instrument; or (3) in the case of an oral trust, by information identifying the settlor or other source of funds and describing the time and manner of the trust’s creation and the terms of the trust, including the subject matter, beneficiaries and time of performance. If a trust has been registered elsewhere, registration in this state is ineffective until the earlier registration is released by order of the court where prior registration occurred, or an instrument executed by the trustee and all beneficiaries, filed with the registration in this state.

§ 15-7-103. Effect of registration.

By registering a trust, or accepting the trusteeship of a registered trust, the trustee submits personally to the jurisdiction of the court in any proceeding under [section] 15-7-201[, Idaho Code,] of this code relating to the trust that may be initiated by any interested person while the trust remains registered. Notice of any proceeding shall be delivered to the trustee, or mailed to him by ordinary first class mail at his address as listed in the registration or as thereafter reported to the court and to his address as then known to the petitioner.

To the extent of their interests in the trust, all beneficiaries of a trust properly registered in this state are subject to the jurisdiction of the court of registration for the purposes of proceedings under section 15-7-201[, Idaho Code,] of this code, provided notice is given pursuant to section 15-1-401[, Idaho Code,] of this code.

§ 15-7-104. Effect of failure to register.

A trustee who fails to register a trust in a proper place as required by this Part, for purposes of any proceedings initiated by a beneficiary of the trust prior to registration, is subject to the personal jurisdiction of any court in which the trust could have been registered. In addition, any trustee who, within thirty (30) days after receipt of a written demand by a settlor or beneficiary of the trust, fails to register a trust as required by this chapter is subject to removal and denial of compensation or to surcharge as the court may direct unless directed not to register by all beneficiaries or as provided in section 15-1-108[, Idaho Code,] of this code a person with a general power of appointment representing all the beneficiaries and acting for them. A provision in the terms of the trust purporting to excuse the trustee from the duty to register, or directing that the trust or trustee shall not be subject to the jurisdiction of the court, is ineffective.

§ 15-7-105. Registration — Qualification of foreign trustee.

A foreign corporate trustee is required to qualify as a foreign corporation doing business in this state if it maintains the principal place of administration of any trust within the state. A foreign cotrustee is not required to qualify in this state solely because its cotrustee maintains the principal place of administration in this state. Unless otherwise doing business in this state, local qualification by a foreign trustee, corporate or individual, is not required in order for the trustee to receive distribution from a local estate or to hold, invest in, manage or acquire property located in this state, or maintain litigation. Nothing in this section affects a determination of what other acts require qualification as doing business in this state.